Utah statutes.
62A-5-103.2.   Pilot Program for the Provision of Family Preservation Services.

(1)  There is established a pilot program for the provision of family preservation services to a person with a disability and that person's family, beginning on July 1, 2007, and ending on July 1, 2009.

(2)  The family preservation services described in Subsection (1) may include:

(a)  family skill building classes;

(b)  respite hours for class attendance; or

(c)  professional intervention.

(3)  The division shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary for the implementation and administration of this section.

(4)  In accordance with Subsection (5), within funds appropriated by the Legislature for the pilot program described in this section, the division shall provide family preservation services to a person with a disability, and that person's family, if that person:

(a)  is eligible to receive services from the division;

(b)  has applied for, and is willing to receive, services from the division;

(c)  is not receiving other ongoing services from the division;

(d)  is not able to receive sufficient family preservation services from other sources;

(e)  is determined by the division to be a person who would substantially benefit from the provision of family preservation services; and

(f)  does not require the provision of other ongoing services from the division in order to substantially benefit from the provision of family preservation services.

(5) (a)  The division shall provide family preservation services under this section outside of the prioritization criteria established by the division for the receipt of other services from the division.

(b)  The division shall establish criteria to determine the priority, between persons eligible for services under this section, for receiving services under this section.

(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the services provided under the pilot program described in this section:

(a)  shall be provided separately from the Medicaid program described in Title XIX of the Social Security Act;

(b)  may not be supported with Medicaid funds;

(c)  may not be provided as part of a Medicaid waiver;

(d)  do not constitute an entitlement of any kind; and

(e)  may be withdrawn from a person at any time.



Amended by Chapter 29, 2009 General Session

